North Carolina statutes. Chapter 78C. Investment Advisers.
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 78C-46.
Scope of the Chapter; service of process.

G.S. 78C-8

, 78C-16(a) and (b), 78C-10, and 78C-38 apply when any act instrumental in effecting prohibited conduct is done in this State, whether or not either party is then present in this State.

Every applicant for registration under this Chapter shall file with the Administrator, in such form as he by rule prescribes, an irrevocable consent appointing the Administrator or his successor in office to be his attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action or proceeding against him or his successor, executor or administrator which arises under this Chapter or any rule or order hereunder after the consent has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent. A person who has filed such a consent in connection with a previous registration or notice filing need not file another. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the Administrator, but it is not effective unless (i) the plaintiff, who may be the Administrator in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by him, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at his last address on file with the Administrator, and (ii) the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with the subsection is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

When any person, including any nonresident of this State, engages in conduct prohibited or made actionable by this Chapter or any rule or order hereunder, and he has not filed a consent to service of process under subsection (b) of this section and personal jurisdiction over him cannot otherwise be obtained in this State, that conduct shall be considered equivalent to his appointment of the Administrator or his successor in office to be his attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against him or his successor, executor or administrator which grows out of that conduct and which is brought under this Chapter or any rule or order hereunder with the same force and validity as if served on him personally. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the Administrator, and it is not effective unless (i) the plaintiff, who may be the Administrator in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by him, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at his last known address or takes other steps which are reasonably calculated to give actual notice, and (ii) the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this subsection is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

When process is served under this section, the court, or the Administrator in a proceeding before him, shall order such continuance as may be necessary to afford the defendant or respondent reasonable opportunity to defend.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1098, s. 1; 1997-419, s. 19.

§ 78C-47.
Statutory policy.

This Chapter shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it and to coordinate the interpretation and administration of this Chapter with the related federal regulation. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to limit or preclude the applicability of any provision of Chapters 78A or 150B of the General Statutes.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1098, s. 1.

§ 78C-48.
Severability of provisions.

If any provision of this Chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the Chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Chapter are severable.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1098, s. 1.

§§ 78C-49 through 78C-59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.